Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Bank Holding Companies

§ 13-9-201.
Examination; fee.

Each bank holding company owning or acquiring the controlling interest of a bank is subject to the inspection of the commissioner. The commissioner or a duly appointed examiner shall visit the offices of the bank holding company whenever the commissioner feels it is necessary or expedient and make a complete and careful examination of the conditions and resources of the bank holding company, the mode of managing its affairs and conducting its business and the safety and prudence of its management as it relates to the policies of the banks which it controls.

The commissioner shall collect from every bank holding company subject to this section an amount equal to the total cost of the examination and all actual and necessary expenses. The fees and expenses collected shall be remitted to the state treasurer as collected and credited to the financial institutions administration account. Expenditures shall be made from the account by warrants drawn by the state auditor, upon vouchers issued and signed by the director or commissioner. Funds from the account shall be expended only to carry out the duties of the commissioner or the state banking board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 216, §§ 1, 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-195.1, 13-195.7; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, § 1; 2001, ch. 73, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the second sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 13-9-202.
“Controlling interest” defined.

As used in W.S.

13-9-201

through

13-9-203

“controlling interest” shall be construed consistently with the provisions of 12 U.S.C. section 1841(a)(2).

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 216, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 13-195.2; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1997, ch. 75, § 2; 1999, ch. 42, § 2.

§ 13-9-203.
Financial responsibility.

The commissioner shall examine the capital and other ownership structure of each bank holding company subject to W.S.

13-9-201

and shall require the same degree of financial responsibility of the bank holding company required by this act of the bank controlled.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 216, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 13-195.3; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2001, ch. 73, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-9-204.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 216, § 4, related to the authority of the commissioner to order a corporation or individual to discontinue unsound practices or acts.

§ 13-9-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 75, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 216, §§ 5 and 6, related to filing an annual report regarding financial condition with the state banking commissioner.